Washington statutes.
RCW 43.79.201

C.E.P. & R.I. account—Moneys transferred to charitable, educational, penal and reformatory institutions account—Exception.

(1) The charitable, educational, penal and reformatory institutions account is hereby created, in the state treasury, into which account there shall be deposited all moneys arising from the sale, lease or transfer of the land granted by the United States government to the state for charitable, educational, penal and reformatory institutions by section 17 of the enabling act, or otherwise set apart for such institutions, except all moneys arising from the sale, lease, or transfer of that certain one hundred thousand acres of such land assigned for the support of the University of Washington by chapter 91, Laws of 1903 and section 9, chapter 122, Laws of 1893.

(2) If feasible, not less than one-half of all income to the charitable, educational, penal, and reformatory institutions account shall be appropriated for the purpose of providing housing, including repair and renovation of state institutions, for persons with mental illness or developmental disabilities, or youth who are blind, deaf, or otherwise disabled. If moneys are appropriated for community-based housing, the moneys shall be appropriated to the department of commerce for the housing assistance program under chapter 43.185A RCW. During the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory institutions account to the state general fund such amounts as reflect excess fund balance of the account.

[ 2023 c 275 s 18; 2016 sp.s. c 36 s 930; 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 945; 2009 c 564 s 935; 1995 c 399 s 77; 1991 sp.s. c 13 s 39; 1991 c 204 s 3; 1985 c 57 s 37; 1965 ex.s. c 135 s 2; 1965 c 8 s 43.79.201. Prior: 1961 c 170 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2016 sp.s. c 36: See note following RCW 18.20.430.

Effective dates—2011 1st sp.s. c 50: See note following RCW 15.76.115.

Effective date—2009 c 564: See note following RCW 2.68.020.

Effective dates—Severability—1991 sp.s. c 13: See notes following RCW 18.08.240.

Effective date—1985 c 57: See note following RCW 18.04.105.

Income potential: RCW 79.02.410.

Inventory of land: RCW 79.02.400.